Illinois, session 104th, SB701.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Access to Public Health Data Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 501/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Access to Public Health Data Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-423, eff. 1-1-24.)